Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-258
Use of tax money.

The money raised by the operational tax levy authorized in section 2-257 shall be used for the purpose of paying premiums and for permanent improvements for such fair, for the purpose of purchasing the necessary fair supplies, advertising, and the paying of necessary labor in connection therewith, and for other necessary expenses for the operation of the fair. In the county in which the Nebraska State Fair is located, the money so raised may be used for permanent improvements on the state and county fairgrounds or for leasing, contracting for, or in any manner acquiring use of fairground facilities for such fairs.

Laws 1921, c. 5, § 1, p. 66;

C.S.1922, § 6;

Laws 1925, c. 10, § 1, p. 77;

Laws 1927, c. 13, § 1, p. 96;

Laws 1929, c. 5, § 1, p. 70;

C.S.1929, § 2-201;

R.S.1943, § 2-202;

Laws 1977, LB 484, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 2-202;

Laws 1997, LB 469, § 9;

Laws 2008, LB1116, § 7.